Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.810

Hydroplane races—Providing for restrooms and other services in public parks for spectators—Admission fees—Authorized.

Any city or town may provide restrooms and other services in its public parks to be used by spectators of any hydroplane race held on a lake or river which is located adjacent to or within the city or town, and in addition any city or town may charge admission fees for persons to observe a hydroplane race from public park property which is sufficient to defray the costs of the city or town accommodating spectators, cleaning up after the race, and other costs related to the hydroplane race. Any city or town may authorize the organization which sponsors a hydroplane race to provide restroom and other services for the public on park property and may authorize the organization to collect any admission fees charged by the city or town.

[ 1979 c 26 s 1.]